Missouri, session 2026, HB2836.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 558.019, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 558.019, to read as follows:
558.019. 1. This section shall not be construed to affect the powers of the governor
under Article IV, Section 7, of the Missouri Constitution. This statute shall not affect those
provisions of section 565.020 or section 566.125, which set minimum terms of sentences, or
the provisions of section 559.115, relating to probation.
2. The provisions of subsections 2 to 5 of this section shall only be applicable to the
offenses contained in sections 565.021, 565.023, 565.024, 565.027, 565.050, 565.052,
565.054, 565.072, 565.073, 565.074, 565.090, 565.110, 565.115, 565.120, 565.153, 565.156,
565.225, 565.300, 566.030, 566.031, 566.032, 566.034, 566.060, 566.061, 566.062, 566.064,
566.067, 566.068, 566.069, 566.071, 566.083, 566.086, 566.100, 566.101, 566.103, 566.111,
566.115, 566.145, 566.151, 566.153, 566.203, 566.206, 566.209, 566.210, 566.211, 566.215,
568.030, 568.045, 568.060, 568.065, 568.175, 569.040, 569.160, 570.023, 570.025, 570.030
when punished as a class A, B, or C felony, 570.145 when punished as a class A or B felony,
570.223 when punished as a class B or C felony, 571.020, 571.030, 571.070, 573.023,
573.025, 573.035, 573.037, 573.200, 573.205, 574.070, 574.080, 574.115, 575.030, 575.150,
575.153, 575.155, 575.157, 575.200 when punished as a class A felony, 575.210, 575.230
when punished as a class B felony, 575.240 when punished as a class B felony, 576.070,
576.080, 577.010, 577.013, 577.078, 577.703, 577.706, 579.065, and 579.068 when punished
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2836 2
as a class A or B felony. For the purposes of this section, "prison commitment" means and is
the receipt by the department of corrections of an offender after sentencing. For purposes of
this section, prior prison commitments to the department of corrections shall not include an
offender's first incarceration prior to release on probation under section 217.362 or 559.115.
Other provisions of the law to the contrary notwithstanding, any offender who has been found
guilty of a felony other than a dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061 and is
committed to the department of corrections shall be required to serve the following minimum
prison terms:
(1) If the offender has one previous prison commitment to the department of
corrections for a felony offense, the minimum prison term which the offender must serve shall
be forty percent of his or her sentence or until the offender attains [seventy] sixty years of
age, and has served at least [thirty] twentypercent of the sentence imposed, whichever occurs
first;
(2) If the offender has two previous prison commitments to the department of
corrections for felonies unrelated to the present offense, the minimum prison term which the
offender must serve shall be fifty percent of his or her sentence or until the offender attains
[seventy] sixty years of age, and has served at least [forty] thirty percent of the sentence
imposed, whichever occurs first;
(3) If the offender has three or more previous prison commitments to the department
of corrections for felonies unrelated to the present offense, the minimum prison term which
the offender must serve shall be eighty percent of his or her sentence or until the offender
attains [seventy] sixty years of age, and has served at least [forty] thirty percent of the
sentence imposed, whichever occurs first.
3. Other provisions of the law to the contrary notwithstanding, any offender who has
been found guilty of a dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061 and is committed to the
department of corrections shall be required to serve a minimum prison term of eighty-five
percent of the sentence imposed by the court or until the offender attains [seventy] sixtyyears
of age, and has served at least [forty] thirty percent of the sentence imposed, whichever
occurs first.
4. For the purpose of determining the minimum prison term to be served, the
following calculations shall apply:
(1) A sentence of life shall be calculated to be thirty years;
(2) Any sentence either alone or in the aggregate with other consecutive sentences for
offenses committed at or near the same time which is over seventy-five years shall be
calculated to be seventy-five years.

HB 2836 3
5. For purposes of this section, the term "minimum prison term" shall mean time
required to be served by the offender before he or she is eligible for parole, conditional
release or other early release by the department of corrections.
6. An offender who was convicted of, or pled guilty to, a felony offense other than
those offenses listed in subsection 2 of this section prior to August 28, 2019, shall no longer
be subject to the minimum prison term provisions under subsection 2 of this section, and shall
be eligible for parole, conditional release, or other early release by the department of
corrections according to the rules and regulations of the department.
7. (1) A sentencing advisory commission is hereby created to consist of eleven
members. One member shall be appointed by the speaker of the house. One member shall be
appointed by the president pro tem of the senate. One member shall be the director of the
department of corrections. Six members shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the
governor from among the following: the public defender commission; private citizens; a
private member of the Missouri Bar; the board of probation and parole; and a prosecutor.
Two members shall be appointed by the supreme court, one from a metropolitan area and one
from a rural area. All members shall be appointed to a four-year term. All members of the
sentencing commission appointed prior to August 28, 1994, shall continue to serve on the
sentencing advisory commission at the pleasure of the governor.
(2) The commission shall study sentencing practices in the circuit courts throughout
the state for the purpose of determining whether and to what extent disparities exist among
the various circuit courts with respect to the length of sentences imposed and the use of
probation for offenders convicted of the same or similar offenses and with similar criminal
histories. The commission shall also study and examine whether and to what extent
sentencing disparity among economic and social classes exists in relation to the sentence of
death and if so, the reasons therefor, if sentences are comparable to other states, if the length
of the sentence is appropriate, and the rate of rehabilitation based on sentence. It shall
compile statistics, examine cases, draw conclusions, and perform other duties relevant to the
research and investigation of disparities in death penalty sentencing among economic and
social classes.
(3) The commission shall study alternative sentences, prison work programs, work
release, home-based incarceration, probation and parole options, and any other programs and
report the feasibility of these options in Missouri.
(4) The governor shall select a chairperson who shall call meetings of the commission
as required or permitted pursuant to the purpose of the sentencing commission.
(5) The members of the commission shall not receive compensation for their duties
on the commission, but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the

HB 2836 4
performance of these duties and for which they are not reimbursed by reason of their other
paid positions.
(6) The circuit and associate circuit courts of this state, the office of the state courts
administrator, the department of public safety, and the department of corrections shall
cooperate with the commission by providing information or access to information needed by
the commission. The office of the state courts administrator will provide needed staffing
resources.
8. Courts shall retain discretion to lower or exceed the sentence recommended by the
commission as otherwise allowable by law, and to order restorative justice methods, when
applicable.
9. If the imposition or execution of a sentence is suspended, the court may order any
100 or all of the following restorative justice methods, or any other method that the court finds
101 just or appropriate:
102 (1) Restitution to any victim or a statutorily created fund for costs incurred as a result
103 of the offender's actions;
104 (2) Offender treatment programs;
105 (3) Mandatory community service;
106 (4) Work release programs in local facilities; and
107 (5) Community-based residential and nonresidential programs.
108 10. Pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection 9 of this section, the court may order the
109 assessment and payment of a designated amount of restitution to a county law enforcement
110 restitution fund established by the county commission pursuant to section 50.565. Such
111 contribution shall not exceed three hundred dollars for any charged offense. Any restitution
112 moneys deposited into the county law enforcement restitution fund pursuant to this section
113 shall only be expended pursuant to the provisions of section 50.565.
114 11. A judge may order payment to a restitution fund only if such fund had been
115 created by ordinance or resolution of a county of the state of Missouri prior to sentencing. A
116 judge shall not have any direct supervisory authority or administrative control over any fund
117 to which the judge is ordering a person to make payment.
118 12. A person who fails to make a payment to a county law enforcement restitution
119 fund may not have his or her probation revoked solely for failing to make such payment
120 unless the judge, after evidentiary hearing, makes a finding supported by a preponderance of
121 the evidence that the person either willfully refused to make the payment or that the person
122 willfully, intentionally, and purposefully failed to make sufficient bona fide efforts to acquire
123 the resources to pay.

HB 2836 5
124 13. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow the sentencing advisory
125 commission to issue recommended sentences in specific cases pending in the courts of this
126 state.
✔